browser/locales/l10n/et/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/et.aff
SFX x janud gavaissegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavaist [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavaistki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavaita [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavaitagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavaks [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavakski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gaval [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavale [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavalegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavalgi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavalt [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavaltki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavana [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavanagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavani [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavanigi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavas [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavaski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavasse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavassegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavast [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavastki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavat [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavata [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavate [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatega [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavategagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavategi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavateks [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatekski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatel [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatele [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatelegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatelgi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatelt [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavateltki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatena [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatenagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavateni [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatenigi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavates [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavateski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatesse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatessegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatest [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatestki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavateta [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatetagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavatki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavgi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavus [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavused [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusedki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusega [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusegagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseid [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseidki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseiga [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseigagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseiks [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseikski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseil [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseile [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseilegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseilgi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseilt [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseiltki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseina [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseinagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseini [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseinigi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseis [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseiski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseisse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseissegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseist [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseistki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseita [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseitagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseks [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusekski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusel [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusele [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuselegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuselgi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuselt [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseltki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusena [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusenagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseni [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusenigi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuses [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusesse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusessegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusest [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusestki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuseta [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusetagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusiga [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusigagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusigi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusiks [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusikski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusil [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusile [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusilegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusilgi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusilt [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusiltki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusina [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusinagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusini [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusinigi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusis [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusiski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusisse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusissegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusist [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusistki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusita [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusitagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavussegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavust [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavuste [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustega [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustegagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusteks [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustekski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustel [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustele [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustelegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustelgi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustelt [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusteltki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustena [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustenagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusteni [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustenigi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustes [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusteski [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustesse [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustessegi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustest [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustestki [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavusteta [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustetagi [lr]janud
SFX x janud gavustki [lr]janud

# rule/flag 13841 (affects 72744 words, has 25 subrules):
SFX y Y 25
SFX y a eta da
SFX y a etagi da
SFX y a etagu da
SFX y a etagugi da
SFX y a etaks da
SFX y a etakse da
SFX y a etaksegi da
SFX y a etakski da
SFX y a etama da
SFX y a etamagi da
SFX y a etav da
SFX y a etavgi da
SFX y a etavus da
SFX y a etavuski da
SFX y a etavusse da
SFX y a etavussegi da
SFX y a etavust da
SFX y a etavustki da
SFX y a eti da
SFX y a etigi da
SFX y a i ga
SFX y d ksidki ud
SFX y d ksimegi ud
SFX y d ksingi ud
SFX y d ksitegi ud

# rule/flag 13866 (affects 6969 words, has 101 subrules):
SFX z Y 101
SFX z a use ga
SFX z a used ga
SFX z a usedki ga
SFX z a usega ga
SFX z a usegagi ga
SFX z a usegi ga
SFX z a useid ga
SFX z a useidki ga
SFX z a useiga ga
SFX z a useigagi ga
SFX z a useiks ga
SFX z a useikski ga
SFX z a useil ga
SFX z a useile ga
SFX z a useilegi ga
SFX z a useilgi ga
SFX z a useilt ga
SFX z a useiltki ga
SFX z a useina ga
SFX z a useinagi ga
SFX z a useini ga
SFX z a useinigi ga
SFX z a useis ga
SFX z a useiski ga
SFX z a useisse ga
SFX z a useissegi ga
SFX z a useist ga
SFX z a useistki ga
SFX z a useita ga
SFX z a useitagi ga
SFX z a useks ga
SFX z a usekski ga
SFX z a usel ga
SFX z a usele ga
SFX z a uselegi ga
SFX z a uselgi ga
SFX z a uselt ga
SFX z a useltki ga
SFX z a usena ga
SFX z a usenagi ga
SFX z a useni ga
SFX z a usenigi ga
SFX z a uses ga
SFX z a useski ga
SFX z a usesse ga
SFX z a usessegi ga
SFX z a usest ga
SFX z a usestki ga
SFX z a useta ga
SFX z a usetagi ga
SFX z a usi ga
SFX z a usiga ga
SFX z a usigagi ga
SFX z a usigi ga
SFX z a usiks ga
SFX z a usikski ga
SFX z a usil ga
SFX z a usile ga
SFX z a usilegi ga
SFX z a usilgi ga
SFX z a usilt ga
SFX z a usiltki ga
SFX z a usina ga
SFX z a usinagi ga
SFX z a usini ga
SFX z a usinigi ga
SFX z a usis ga
SFX z a usiski ga
SFX z a usisse ga
SFX z a usissegi ga
SFX z a usist ga
SFX z a usistki ga
SFX z a usita ga
SFX z a usitagi ga
SFX z a uste ga
SFX z a ustega ga
SFX z a ustegagi ga
SFX z a ustegi ga
SFX z a usteks ga
SFX z a ustekski ga
SFX z a ustel ga
SFX z a ustele ga
SFX z a ustelegi ga
SFX z a ustelgi ga
SFX z a ustelt ga
SFX z a usteltki ga
SFX z a ustena ga
SFX z a ustenagi ga
SFX z a usteni ga
SFX z a ustenigi ga
SFX z a ustes ga
SFX z a usteski ga
SFX z a ustesse ga
SFX z a ustessegi ga
SFX z a ustest ga
SFX z a ustestki ga
SFX z a usteta ga
SFX z a ustetagi ga
SFX z d gi ud
SFX z d ta ud
SFX z d tagi ud
